North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-13 State Normal Schools

15-13-01.
Normal schools — Location — Names.

The state normal schools established at Valley City in the county of Barnes, at Mayville in the county of Traill, at Minot in the county of Ward, and at Dickinson in the county of Stark, and any other normal schools that may be established by law, are the normal schools of the state. The name of the normal school at Valley City is Valley City state university, the name of the normal school at Mayville is Mayville state university, the name of the normal school at Minot is Minot state university, and the name of the normal school at Dickinson is Dickinson state university.

Source:

N.D. Const., §§ 215, 216; S.L. 1891, ch. 89, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 905; R.C. 1899, § 905; R.C. 1905, § 1074; S.L. 1911, ch. 61, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1578; R.C. 1943, § 15-1301; S.L. 1963, ch. 142, § 1; 1987, ch. 3, § 16.

Cross-References.

Control and administration of normal schools by state board of higher education, see § 15-10-01.

15-13-02.
Purpose of normal schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-13-03.
Courses of study — Limitation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-13-04.
President — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-13-05.
Annual report of normal school president. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-06.
Degrees — Diplomas. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-07.
Separate funds for allocations to several normal schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-08.
State normal school students’ loan fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-09.
Administration of students’ loan fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-10.
Participation in students’ loan fund — Loans limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-11.
Board of higher education to make rules governing students’ loan funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-13-12.
Authorization to pledge rentals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.